Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-291
Derivative action; expenses; attorney's fees.

If a derivative action is successful, in whole or in part, or if anything is received by the plaintiff as a result of a judgment, compromise, or settlement of an action or claim, the court may award the plaintiff reasonable expenses, including reasonable attorney's fees, and shall direct him or her to remit to the limited partnership the remainder of those proceeds received by him or her.

Laws 1981, LB 272, § 59.